Arkansas, session 2025, HB1182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-87-701 - 17-87-708 are amended to read
as follows:
17-87-701. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Board” means the Arkansas State Board of Nursing "Certified
medication assistant" means a person who is certified by the board to
administer certain nonprescription and legend drugs in designated facilities;
(2) “Designated facility” means a type of facility determined by
the board as an environment in which medication assistive persons a certified
medication assistant may serve in accordance with the requirements of this
subchapter and rules promulgated by the board;
*JMB094*
01/21/2025 3:25:59 PM JMB094

HB1182
(3) “Medication assistive person” means a person who is
certified by the board to administer certain nonprescription and legend drugs
in designated facilities; and
(4)(3) “Supervision” means the active oversight of patient care
services while on the premises of a designated facility in a manner defined
by the board.

17-87-702. Certificate required.
In order to safeguard life and health, any a person serving or offering
to serve as a medication assistive person certified medication assistant
shall:
(1) Submit evidence that he or she is qualified to so serve; and
(2) Be certified as provided in this subchapter.

17-87-703. Designated facilities — Notification of use of certified
medication assistants required.
(a) The Arkansas State Board of Nursing shall designate the types of
facilities that may use medication assistive persons.
(b)(1) Designated facilities may not be required to use medication
assistive persons.
(2) However, if a designated facility elects to use medication
assistive personnel, the facility shall notify the board in a manner
prescribed by the board.
(a) The Arkansas State Board of Nursing shall not require a designated
facility to use certified medication assistants.
(b) A designated facility that elects to use certified medication
assistants shall notify the board in a manner prescribed by the board.

17-87-704. Qualifications.
(a) In order to To be certified as a medication assistive person
certified medication assistant, an applicant shall submit to the Arkansas
State Board of Nursing written evidence, verified by oath, that the
applicant:
(1) The applicant meets all of the following requirements:
(A) Is currently listed in good standing on the state's
certified nurse aide registry;
01/21/2025 3:25:59 PM JMB094

HB1182
(B) Has maintained registration on the state's certified
nurse aide registry continuously for a minimum of one (1) year;
(C) Has completed at least one (1) continuous year of
full-time experience as a certified nurse aide in this state;
(D)(B) Is currently employed at a designated facility;
(E)(C) Has a high school diploma or the equivalent;
(F)(D) Has successfully completed a literacy and reading
comprehension screening process approved by the board;
(G)(E) Has successfully completed a medication assistive
person certified medication assistant training course of not less than one
hundred (100) one hundred fifteen (115) hours approved by the board; and
(H)(F) Has successfully passed an examination on subjects
the board determines; or
(2)(A)(2) The applicant has:
(A) Completed Has completed a portion of a nursing
education program equivalent to the medication assistive person certified
medication assistant training course; and
(B) Passed the medication aide certified medication
assistant examination.
(b) The board may issue a certification as a medication assistive
person certified medication assistant by endorsement to an applicant who has
been licensed or certified as a medication assistive person certified
medication assistant under the laws of another state or territory, if:
(1) In the opinion of the board, the applicant meets the
qualifications of medication assistive persons a certified medication
assistant in this state; and
(2) The board recommends certification.
(c) Any A person holding a certification as a medication assistive
person shall have the right to certified medication assistant may use the
title “medication assistive person” "certified medication assistant" or
"medication assistant - certified" and the abbreviation “M.A.P.” "C.M.A." or
"M.A. - C.".
(d) The training courses for medication assistive persons a certified
medication assistant may be provided by a postsecondary educational
institution, a hospital, or a consortium of five (5) or more skilled nursing
facilities.
01/21/2025 3:25:59 PM JMB094

HB1182

17-87-705. Scope of work.
(a)(1) A medication assistive person certified medication assistant
may perform the delegated nursing function of medication administration and
related tasks in accordance with rules promulgated by the Arkansas State
Board of Nursing.
(2) A medication assistive person certified medication assistant
shall perform medication administration and related tasks only:
(A) At a designated facility; and
(B) Under the supervision of a licensed nurse.
(3)(A) Medication administration shall be limited to the
administration of nonprescription and legend drugs ordered by an authorized
prescriber by the following methods:
(i) Orally;
(ii) Topically;
(iii) Drops for eye, ear, or nose;
(iv) Vaginally;
(v) Rectally;
(vi) Transdermally; and
(vii) Via oral inhaler Inhalation; and
(viii) Subcutaneous injections of insulin.
(B) Medication administration by a medication assistive
person certified medication assistant shall not include controlled
substances.
(b) A medication assistive person certified medication assistant shall
not:
(1) Receive, have access to, or administer any controlled
substance;
(2) Administer parenteral, enteral, or injectable medications,
except as authorized under this subchapter;
(3) Administer any substances by nasogastric or gastrostomy
tubes;
(4) Calculate drug dosages;
(5) Destroy medication;
(6) Receive orders, either in writing or verbally, for new or
changed medications;
01/21/2025 3:25:59 PM JMB094

HB1182
(7) Transcribe orders from the medical record;
(8) Order initial medications;
(9) Evaluate medication error reports;
(10) Perform treatments;
(11) Conduct patient assessments or evaluations; or
(12) Engage in patient teaching activities.

17-87-706. Renewal of certifications.
(a)(1) The Arkansas State Board of Nursing shall prescribe the
procedure for the cyclical renewal of medication assistive person
certifications the certification of a certified medication assistant.
(2) In each case, the board shall mail a notification for
renewal to the medication assistive person certified medication assistant at
least thirty (30) days before the expiration date of the certification.
(b)(1) Upon receipt of the renewal application and the fee, the board
shall verify the accuracy of the application.
(2)(A) If the board finds the application to be accurate, the
board shall issue a certificate of renewal to the applicant.
(B) As a condition of certification renewal, a medication
assistive person certified medication assistant shall be:
(i) Currently listed in good standing on the state's
certified nurse aide registry; and
(ii) Required to satisfactorily complete at least
eight (8) hours of continuing medication education course work as required by
the board.
(c) The renewal shall render A renewal of a certificate under this
section renders the holder of the certificate a legal provider of medication
assistive person certified medication assistant services for the period
stated in the certificate of renewal.
(d) Any medication assistive person A certified medication assistant
who allows his or her certification to lapse by failing to renew the
certification as provided in this section may be reinstated by the board on:
(1) Payment of the renewal fee plus a penalty; and
(2) Submission of evidence that the person currently meets the
requirements to serve as a medication assistive person certified medication
assistant.
01/21/2025 3:25:59 PM JMB094

HB1182
(e) Any A person providing services as a medication assistive person
certified medication assistant during the time his or her certification has
lapsed shall be considered to be is providing services illegally and shall be
subject to the penalties provided for violations of this subchapter.

17-87-707. Disciplinary actions.
(a) The Arkansas State Board of Nursing shall have has sole authority
to deny, suspend, revoke, or limit any medication assistive person
certificate of a certified medication assistant issued by the board or
applied for in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter or to
otherwise discipline a certificate holder upon proof that the person:
(1) Has been found guilty of or pleads guilty or nolo contendere
to:
(A) Fraud or deceit in procuring or attempting to procure
a medication assistive person certificate of a certified medication
assistant; or
(B) Providing services as a medication assistive person
certified medication assistant without a valid certificate;
(2) Is unfit or incompetent by reason of negligence, habits, or
other causes;
(3) Is habitually intemperate or is addicted to the use of
habit-forming drugs;
(4) Is mentally incompetent;
(5) Is guilty of unprofessional conduct;
(6) Has had a license, certificate, or registration revoked or
suspended;
(7) Has been placed on probation or under disciplinary order in
any jurisdiction;
(8) Has voluntarily surrendered a license, certification, or
registration and has not been reinstated in any jurisdiction; or
(9) Has willfully or repeatedly violated any of the provisions
of this subchapter.
(b) The board shall refuse to issue or shall revoke the certificate of
any person who would be disqualified from employment under the provisions of
§ 20-33-213.
(c) Proceedings under this section shall be conducted in accordance
01/21/2025 3:25:59 PM JMB094

HB1182
with the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

17-87-708. Penalty.
(a)(1) It shall be a misdemeanor for any person to It is unlawful for
a person to:
(A) Sell or fraudulently obtain or furnish any medication
assistive person's certified medication assistant's certificate, renewal, or
record or aid or abet in any such sale or fraud;
(B) Serve as a medication assistive person certified
medication assistant under cover of any certificate or record illegally or
fraudulently obtained or signed or issued unlawfully or under fraudulent
representation;
(C) Serve as a medication assistive person certified
medication assistant unless certified by the Arkansas State Board of Nursing;
(D) Use in connection with his or her name any of the
following titles, names, or initials if the user is not properly certified
under this subchapter:
(i) Medication assistive person;
(ii) M.A.P.;
(iii) Medication aide;
(iv)(ii) Medication technician;
(v)(iii) Medication assistant;
(vi)(iv) Certified medication aide assistant;
(vii)(v) C.M.A.;
(viii)(vi) Medication assistant – Certified;
(ix)(vii) MA – C; or
(x)(viii) Any other name, title, or initials that
would cause a reasonable person to believe the user is certified under this
subchapter;
(E) Serve as a medication assistive person certified
medication assistant during the time his or her certification is suspended;
(F) Conduct an education program for the preparation of
medication assistive persons certified medication assistants unless the
program has been approved by the board; or
(G) Otherwise violate any provisions of this subchapter.
(2)(A) A misdemeanor violation under subdivision (a)(1) of this
01/21/2025 3:25:59 PM JMB094

HB1182
section shall be is a violation punishable by a fine of not less than twenty-
five dollars ($25.00) or more than five hundred dollars ($500).
(B) Each subsequent offense under subdivision (a)(1) of
this section shall be punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred
dollars ($500) or by imprisonment of not more than thirty (30) days, or by
both a fine and imprisonment is a Class C misdemeanor.
(b)(1) After providing notice and a hearing, the board may levy civil
penalties in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) against a
person or entity for each violation of this subchapter or rules promulgated
under this subchapter.
(2) Each day of violation shall be a separate offense.
(c)(3) Unless a penalty assessed under this section subsection is paid
within fifteen (15) calendar days following the date for an appeal from the
order, the board may file suit in Pulaski County Circuit Court to obtain a
judgment for the amount of penalty not paid.
(d)(c) The penalties permitted in this section shall be in addition to
other penalties that may be imposed by the board under this subchapter.



















01/21/2025 3:25:59 PM JMB094